District of Columbia statutes.
7-2810

Inspections.

The Mayor is authorized to inspect the facilities of any alarm dealer, central alarm station, or commercial user or subscriber during reasonable business hours to determine whether the requirements of this chapter are being met. Information obtained pursuant to such inspections shall be kept confidential and used only in conjunction with the enforcement of this chapter or for other authorized purposes.

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 11, 27 DCR 3760
Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-99, § 2(l), 35 DCR 1051
1981 Ed., § 6-3110.